Utah statutes.
76-8-202.   Official misconduct -- Unlawful acts based on "inside"
information.
A public servant is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if, knowing that official
action is contemplated or in reliance on information which he has acquired by
virtue of his office or from another public servant, which information has not
been made public, he:
(1)  acquires or divests himself of a pecuniary interest in any property,
transaction, or enterprise which may be affected by such action or
information;
(2)  speculates or wagers on the basis of such action or information; or
(3)  knowingly aids another to do any of the foregoing.
